apertium-eng-kaz.kaz.lexc
LEXICON DemonstrativePronouns

PRON-DEM-BUL ;
PRON-DEM-MINA ;
PRON-DEM-ANA ;

сол%<prn%>%<dem%>%<nom%>:сол CLITICS-INCLUDING-COPULA ;
сол%<prn%>%<dem%>:со PRON-DEM-INFL ;
сол%<prn%>%<dem%>%<ins%>:сонымен COMMON-CLITICS ;
сол%<prn%>%<dem%>%<px3sp%>:сонысы%{n%} CASE ;

ол%<prn%>%<dem%>%<nom%>:ол CLITICS-INCLUDING-COPULA ;
ол%<prn%>%<dem%>:о PRON-DEM-INFL ;
ол%<prn%>%<dem%>%<ins%>:онымен COMMON-CLITICS ;
ол%<prn%>%<dem%>%<px3sp%>:онысы%{n%} CASE ;

осы%<prn%>%<dem%>%<nom%>:осы COMMON-CLITICS ;
осы%<prn%>%<dem%>:осы PRON-DEM-INFL ;
осы%<prn%>%<dem%>%<ins%>:осымен COMMON-CLITICS ;
осы%<prn%>%<dem%>%<px3sp%>:осысы%{n%} CASE ;

! FIXME DISCUSS: Two below were lexicalized as conjunctional adverbs.
! -ндықтан affix is a feature of verbs as well though, so it will be handled as a
! productive derivation.

!ол%<prn%>%<dem%>%<reas%>%<abl%>:ондықтан # ; ! "because of that"
!сол%<prn%>%<dem%>%<reas%>%<abl%>:сондықтан # ; ! "because of that"


!!!!!!!   I N T E R R O G A T I V E

! Some of the words listed in the grammars I have as interrogative pronouns
! were placed in other root lexicons depending on what POS they substitute or
! act like syntactically. So (as planned for today):
! 1) "неше" is a <num><itg>;
! 2) "қайда, қайдан, қашан, қалай, қалайша" are <adv><itg> (the first three
! should link to a class containing location cases btw, as many current adverbs
! do);
! 3) "қанша" is added both as an interrogative pronoun and as an interrogative
! adverb /IS/
!
! What already added as interrogative pronouns are: кім, ни, нәрсе
! And to be added as interrogative pronouns are: қайсы, қандай, қанша.
! I'd like to mark қандай as <sim> form (with қандай for the upper side though),
! but wouldn't go too deeply into the structure of other two and not derive them
! from "қай" (that's what they have most likely originated from) IS
!
! Of course, "қай", "қайсы" and all other pronouns which can be used as an
! attribute were added as determiners linking to CLIT as well.
! Good idea is to have an rlx rule selecting determiner reading when a word is
! ambiguous between (prn X nom) and (det X) and there is noun to the right;
! and selecting pronoun if there is a verb to the right.

LEXICON PRON-ITG-INFL

%<prn%>%<itg%>: SUBST ;

LEXICON PRON-ITG-QAYSI

қайсы%<prn%>%<itg%>%<nom%>:қайсы COMMON-CLITICS ;
қайсы%<prn%>%<itg%>%<gen%>:қайсының COMMON-CLITICS ;
қайсы%<prn%>%<itg%>%<dat%>:қайсыған COMMON-CLITICS ;
қайсы%<prn%>%<itg%>%<acc%>:қайсыны COMMON-CLITICS ;
қайсы%<prn%>%<itg%>%<abl%>:қайсыдан COMMON-CLITICS ;
қайсы%<prn%>%<itg%>%<loc%>:қайсыда COMMON-CLITICS ;
қайсы%<prn%>%<itg%>%<ins%>:қайсымен COMMON-CLITICS ;

қайсы%<prn%>%<itg%>:қайсы GER-POSS-REAL ;

LEXICON PRON-ITG-QANSHA

! Might be not complete (қаншалар?)
! Currently қанша<prn><itg> is translated with ничә<num><itg><subst> and
! қанша<adv><itg> is going to be translated with "күпме" or "никадәр"

қанша%<prn%>%<itg%>:қанша CASE ;

LEXICON PRON-ITG-QANDAY

! Might be not complete (қандайларығыз? and possessive stuff in general)

қандай%<prn%>%<itg%>%<sim%>:қандай COMMON-CLITICS ;
! ^ FIXME Similative form of demonstrative pronouns should receive an alternati-
! ve continuation with CLIT too. Consider e,g.: "Ең жақсы Интернет қандай?" Here
! it shouldn't receive <nom> tag I think /IS/
қандай%<prn%>%<itg%>%<sim%>:қандай CASE ;
қандай%<prn%>%<itg%>%<sim%>%<px3sp%>:қандайы%{n%} CASE ;
қандай%<prn%>%<itg%>%<sim%>%<pl%>:қандайлар CASE ;
қандай%<prn%>%<itg%>%<sim%>%<pl%>%<px3sp%>:қандайлары%{n%} CASE ;

LEXICON InterrogativePronouns

PRON-ITG-QAYSI ;
PRON-ITG-QANSHA ;
PRON-ITG-QANDAY ;
нәрсе:нәрсе PRON-ITG-INFL ; ! "thing" ! Use/MT
не:не PRON-ITG-INFL ; ! "what"
кім:кім PRON-ITG-INFL ; ! "who"

LEXICON PRON-QNT-POSS

%<prn%>%<qnt%>: GER-POSS-REAL ;

LEXICON PRON-QNT

%<prn%>%<qnt%>: GER-INFL ;

LEXICON PRON-IND

%<prn%>%<ind%>: CASE ;


LEXICON PRNNEG

%<prn%>%<neg%>: CASE ;

LEXICON PRON-RECIP

%<prn%>%<recip%>: GER-POSS-REAL ;

LEXICON PRON-REF-ADV

CASE-ETC ;
%<adv%>:ше COMMON-CLITICS ;

LEXICON PRON-REF

! FIXME JNW please have a look at this
! Listing all forms here because of overgeneration with *өздерім,
! *өздеріміз, *өзіңдер etc while linking to POSS-REAL. This was the idea.
! Now they are handled more like personal pronouns (the same tags in the same
! order), so they should pass transfer without any trouble.
!-----
! A remaining problem with reflexive pronoun is that it takes personal copula
! suffixes "selectively": e.g. prn.refl.px1sg would take only cop.px1sg
! (prn.ref.px3sp seems to take all of them though).
! A little bit of overgeneration won't hurt anyone :), but I think that odd
! forms could be filtered out somehow later. Don't know how to do it./04Aug, IS/

! FIXME DISCUSS Write full forms for the lower side and put only PRON-DEF in the
! Root Lexicon

%<prn%>%<ref%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>%{I%}м PRON-REF-ADV ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>%{I%}ң PRON-REF-ADV ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>%{S%}%{I%}%{n%} PRON-REF-ADV ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>%{I%}м%{I%}з PRON-REF-ADV ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>д%{A%}р%>%{I%}ң PRON-REF-ADV ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>д%{A%}р%>%{S%}%{I%}%{n%} PRON-REF-ADV ;

%<prn%>%<ref%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<frm%>:%>%{I%}ң%{I%}з PRON-REF-ADV ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<frm%>:%>д%{A%}р%>%{I%}ң%{I%}з PRON-REF-ADV ;

! This is how it was before:
!%<prn%>%<ref%>: POSS-REAL ;
!%<prn%>%<ref%>%<pl%>:%{L%}%{A%}р POSS-REAL ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!     DETERMINERS

LEXICON DET-DEM

%<det%>%<dem%>: # ;

LEXICON DET-QNT

%<det%>%<qnt%>: # ;

LEXICON DET-IND

%<det%>%<ind%>: # ;

LEXICON DET-ITG

%<det%>%<itg%>: # ;

LEXICON DET-NEG

%<det%>%<neg%>: # ;

LEXICON DET-REF

%<det%>%<ref%>: # ;


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!     OTHER PART-OF-SPEECH LEXICONS

LEXICON N1-ABBR

%<n%>%<attr%>: # ;
%<n%>:%- POSSESSION ;
%<n%>:%- CASE-ETC ;


LEXICON N1

%<n%>%<attr%>: # ;
%<n%>: SUBST ;

LEXICON N-COMPOUND-PX-COMMON

:%>%{S%}%{I%}%{n%} CASE-ETC ;
POSS-REAL ;       ! for stuff like "біздің ауа райымыз" and even "оның ауа райы",
                  ! which should have a <px3sp> analysis


LEXICON N-COMPOUND-PX ! consider "N2" for the name
                      ! equiv of kir:LEXICON N-INFL-3PX-COMPOUND

%<n%>: N-COMPOUND-PX-COMMON ;
%<n%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р%>%{S%}%{I%}%{n%} CASE-ETC ; ! (e.g. чик сакчылары=пограничники)
                                                      !  FIXME CHECK: Is {S} needed here ?


LEXICON N3
! Singularia tantum

%<n%>%<attr%>: # ;
%<n%>: N-INFL-COMMON ;

LEXICON N5

:%{☭%} N1 ;


!LEXICON NAT
! Nationalites

!A1 ;              ! nationality's adjectival form, e.g. "Turkish [food]" ! Consider <n.attr> reading for this 
!N1 ;              ! a member of the nationality, e.g. "A Turk"
!:%>ш%{A%} ADV ;   ! as / in the style of the nat., e.g. "à la Turk"
!:%>ш%{A%} ADV ;   ! in the language of the nationality, e.g. "in Turkish" ! I guess ADJ was meant /I.S./
!:%>ш%{A%} N1 ;    ! the language of the nationality, e.g. "Turkish"

LEXICON ADV-LANG

N1 ;
ADV ;

LEXICON NP-COMMON
N-INFL-COMMON ;

LEXICON NP-TOP

%<np%>%<top%>: NP-COMMON ;
%<np%>%<top%>%<attr%>: # ;

!%<adj%>%<top%>:%{L%}%{I%}%{K%} ADJ-COMMON ;  ! FIXME: do these tags make sense?

LEXICON NP-ANT-M

%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>: NP-COMMON ;
%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р NP-COMMON ;

LEXICON NP-ANT-F

%<np%>%<ant%>%<f%>: NP-COMMON ;
%<np%>%<ant%>%<f%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р NP-COMMON ;

LEXICON NP-COG-M

%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>: NP-COMMON ;
%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р NP-COMMON ;

LEXICON NP-COG-MF

! Dual-gender cognoms.
! Don't derive anything /I.S./

%<np%>%<cog%>%<mf%>: NP-COMMON ;
%<np%>%<cog%>%<mf%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р NP-COMMON ;

LEXICON NP-COG-OBIN-FEM

%<np%>%<cog%>%<f%>:а NP-COMMON ;
%<np%>%<cog%>%<f%>%<pl%>:а%>%{L%}%{A%}р NP-COMMON ;

 LEXICON Nouns
авторлық:авторлық N3 ; ! ""
адам% баласы:адам% бала N-COMPOUND-PX ; ! ""
Аллаһ% Тағала:аллаһ% тағала N3 ; ! Dir/LR
Аллаһ% Тағала:Аллаһ% Тағала N3 ; ! ""
археолог:археолог N1 ; ! ""
ауа% райы:ауа% рай N-COMPOUND-PX ; ! "weather,climate"
әуежолы:әуежол N-COMPOUND-PX ; ! "air line"
әуежолы:әуе% жол N-COMPOUND-PX ; ! "air line" ! Dir/LR
баррель:баррель N5 ; ! ""
басылым:басылым N1 ; ! ""
Будда:будда N3 ; ! ""
буддизм:буддизм N5 ; ! "Buddhism"
градус:градус N1 ; ! ""
дүние% жүзі:дүние% жүз N-COMPOUND-PX ; ! "world"
есім:есім N1 ; ! "name"
журналист:журналист N5 ; ! "journalist"
жүз:жүз N1 ; ! "face"
институт:институт N5 ; ! ""
инфляция:инфляция N5 ; ! ""
капитализм:капитализм N5 ; ! ""
кәріп%-қасер:кәріп%-қасер N1 ; ! "poor blind man"
колония:колония N5 ; ! ""
көрсеткіш:көрсеткіш N1 ; ! ""
қазіргі% заман:қазіргі% заман N3 ; ! "" Use/MT
қасқыр:қасқыр N1 ; ! "wolf"
лаборатория:лаборатория N1 ; ! ""
макет:макет N5 ; ! ""
микроорганизм:микроорганизм N5 ; ! ""
миф:миф N1 ; ! ""
отбасы:отбас N-COMPOUND-PX ; ! "family"
пакет:пакет N5 ; ! ""
проблема:проблема N5 ; ! ""
Раббы:раббы N3 ; ! ""
Рамазан:рамазан N3 ; ! ""
реактор:реактор N1 ; ! ""
романтизм:романтизм N5 ; ! ""
съезд:съезд N5 ; ! ""
темір:темір N1 ; ! "iron"
үйлену% тойы:үйлену% той N-COMPOUND-PX ; ! "wedding"
шакірт:шакірт N1 ; ! "disciple"
штаб:штаб N5 ; ! ""
ДНҚ:ДНҚ%{а%} N1-ABBR ; ! "DNA"
пирог:пирог N1 ; ! "  cake"  ! Use/MT eng-kaz
 LEXICON ProperNouns
Өскемен:Өскемен NP-TOP ; ! "Ust-Kamenogorsk"
Омбы:Омбы NP-TOP ; ! ""
Бішкек:Бішкек NP-TOP ; ! ""
Дубай:Дубай NP-TOP ; ! "Dubai"
Мехико:Мехико NP-TOP ; ! "Mexico"
София:София NP-TOP ; ! "" 
Пекин:Пекин NP-TOP ; ! ""
Бутан:Бутан NP-TOP ; ! ""
Жапония:Жапония NP-TOP ; ! "Japan"
Қазақстан:Қазақстан NP-TOP ; ! "Kazakhstan" 
Науру:Науру NP-TOP ; ! ""
Сауд% Арабиясы:Сауд% Арабия N-COMPOUND-PX ; ! ""
Словения:Словения NP-TOP ; ! ""
Чад:Чад NP-TOP ; ! ""
Әмудария:Әмудария NP-TOP ; ! ""
Айман:Айман NP-ANT-F; ! "Ayman" (Kazakh)
Алиса:Алиса NP-ANT-F ; ! ""
Амангелді:Амангелді NP-ANT-M ; ! "" 
Арна:Арна NP-ANT-F; ! "Arna" (Kazakh)
Әділбай:Әділбай NP-ANT-M; ! "Ädilbay" (Arabic)
Әселхан:Әселхан NP-ANT-F; ! "Äselxan" 
Байдәулет:Байдәулет NP-ANT-M; ! "Baydäwlet" (Kazakh)
Бәкібала:Бәкібала NP-ANT-F; ! "Bäkibala" (Kazakh)
Бексейіт:Бексейіт NP-ANT-M; ! "Bekseyit" (Arabic)
Гаяна:Гаяна NP-ANT-F; ! "Gayana" (Greek)
Гүлшар:Гүлшар NP-ANT-F; ! "Gülshar" (Arabic)
Ғанибек:Ғанибек NP-ANT-M; ! "Ğanıybek" (Arabic)
Ділбара:Ділбара NP-ANT-F; ! "Dilbara" (Persian)
Елебай:Елебай NP-ANT-M; ! "Elebay" (Kazakh)
Жадай:Жадай NP-ANT-M; ! "Jaday" (Arabic)
Жолан:Жолан NP-ANT-M; ! "Jolan" (Kazakh)
Зиния:Зиния NP-ANT-F; ! "Ziynıya" (Arabic)
Кәрімбек:Кәрімбек NP-ANT-M; ! "Kärimbek" (Arabic)
Қобдабай:Қобдабай NP-ANT-M; ! "Qobdabay" (Kazakh)
Құрмаш:Құрмаш NP-ANT-F ; ! "Qurmaş"  (sometimes M?)
Мәжен:Мәжен NP-ANT-M; ! "Mäjen" (Arabic)
Мышбай:Мышбай NP-ANT-M; ! "Mıshbay" (Old Turkic)
Нарша:Нарша NP-ANT-F; ! "Narsha" (Kazakh)
Рәбиға:Рәбиға NP-ANT-F; ! "Räbiyğa" (Arabic)
Сағат:Сағат NP-ANT-M; ! "Sağat" (Arabic)
Теңдік:Теңдік NP-ANT-F; ! "Teŋdik" (Kazakh)
Уитнесс:Уитнесс NP-ANT-M ; ! ""
Шырайгүл:Шырайгүл NP-ANT-F; ! "Shıraygül" (Persian)
Толстой:Толстой NP-COG-M ; ! ""
Котил:Котил NP-COG-M ; ! "Kotil (Turkish surname)"
Клоп:Клоп NP-COG-M ; ! "Klopp (German surmame)"
Ватзке:Ватзке NP-COG-M; ! "Watzke (German surname)"
Бланко:Бланко NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Генко:Генко NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Данченко:Данченко NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Жовтис:Жовтис%{☭%} NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Клименко:Клименко NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Лавриненко:Лавриненко NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Марғұлан:Марғұлан NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Николаенко:Николаенко NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Радченко:Радченко NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Сиданко:Сиданко NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Фоменко:Фоменко NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Шекспир:Шекспир NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Холбрук:Холбрук NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
 LEXICON Adverbs
арабша:арабша ADV-LANG ; ! "Arab"
башқұртша:башқұртша ADV-LANG ; ! ""
бурятша:бурятша ADV-LANG ; ! ""
грекше:грекше ADV-LANG ; ! "Greek"
гуараниша:гуараниша ADV-LANG ; ! ""
калмакша:калмакша ADV-LANG ; ! "Kalmyk"
қазақша:қазақша ADV-LANG ; ! "Kazakh"
қытайша:қытайша ADV-LANG ; ! "Chinese"
моңғолша:монғолша ADV-LANG ; ! "Mongol" Dir/LR
мордваша:мордваша ADV-LANG ; ! ""
парсыша:парсыша ADV-LANG ; ! "Persian"
түрікше:түрікше ADV-LANG ; ! "Turkish"
чехше:чехше ADV-LANG ; ! "Czech"
яһудише:яһудише ADV-LANG ; ! "Jewish/Jew"
